New York, session 2025-2026, S8785.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 30-a of section 4 of the veterans' services 2 law, as added by a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the veterans' 3 services law relating to establishing voluntary opportunities for veter- 4 ans, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 274-B and A. 8485, is 5 amended to read as follows: 6 30-a. [(a)] To provide information on the department's website on 7 volunteer opportunities available to veterans as defined in section one 8 of this article, including but not limited to [working at the depart- 9 ment, or], (a) a volunteer fire department, after consultation with the 10 office of fire prevention and control to identify the most effective 11 ways to provide useful information about available volunteer opportu- 12 nities, or (b) an emergency services provider, after consultation with 13 the department of health to identify the most effective ways to provide 14 useful information about available volunteer opportunities. 15 [(b) The department shall post on their website under the employment 16 portal any relevant application forms that a qualified veteran can use 17 to apply for volunteer opportunities or to request additional informa- 18 tion.] 19 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 15 of the veterans' services law, as 20 amended by a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the veterans' services 21 law relating to establishing voluntary opportunities for veterans, as 22 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 274-B and A. 8485, is amended 23 to read as follows: 24 1. A local veterans' service agency shall have power under the direc- 25 tion of the state veterans' service agency, and it shall be its duty to 26 inform military and naval authorities of the United States and assist 27 members of the uniformed services and veterans, who are residents of 28 this state, and their families, in relation to (1) matters pertaining to EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13169-02-6 S. 8785 2 1 educational training and retraining services and facilities, (2) health, 2 medical and rehabilitation services and facilities, (3) provisions of 3 federal, state and local laws and regulations affording special rights 4 and privileges to members of the uniformed services and veterans and 5 their families, (4) employment and re-employment services, (5) the proc- 6 ess of submitting an application for a discharge upgrade to the 7 discharge upgrade advisory board, (6) volunteer opportunities at [the 8 department and] local volunteer fire departments or emergency services 9 providers to the extent such information is available, and (7) other 10 matters of similar, related or appropriate nature. The local veterans' 11 service agency may also assist families of members of the reserve compo- 12 nents of the uniformed services and the organized militia ordered into 13 active duty to ensure that they are made aware of and are receiving all 14 appropriate support available to them and are placed in contact with the 15 agencies responsible for such support, including, but not limited to, 16 the division of military and naval affairs and other state agencies 17 responsible for providing such support. The local veterans' service 18 agency also shall perform such other duties as may be assigned by the 19 state commissioner. 20 § 3. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 21 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the veterans' services 22 law relating to establishing voluntary opportunities for veterans, as 23 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 274-B and A. 8485, takes 24 effect.